Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8522.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 20-23 of the General Laws entitled "Reciprocal Enforcement of
Fishing Laws" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
20-23-2. Enforcement in state boundary waters of boating or fish and game laws.
(a) If and when the state of Connecticut enacts a similar law for arrest and punishment for
violations of boating or fish and game laws of this state, or of the state of Connecticut, committed
or attempted to be committed by any person or persons boating or fishing in that portion of any
waters lying between Connecticut and this state, any game protector, conservation officer, fish and
game warden, special conservation officer, patrolman or other person of either state who is
authorized to make arrests for such violations of boating or fish and game laws of any such other
state or this state shall have authority to make arrests on any part of any such waters lying between
such states and to take the person or persons so arrested for trial to the state in which the violation
was committed, for prosecution according to the laws of such state.
(b) This section shall also apply and take effect if the state of Connecticut has such a law
in effect as of the effective date of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006431
========